Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.340

Registration or update of registration with driver's license or identification card application or renewal.

(1) A person not performing an automatic voter registration transaction under RCW 29A.08.315 may register to vote or update the person's existing voter registration when applying for or renewing a driver's license or identification card under chapter 46.20 RCW.

(2) To register to vote or update a registration, the applicant shall provide the information required by RCW 29A.08.010.

(3) The driver licensing agent shall record that the applicant has requested to register to vote or update a voter registration.

[ 2023 c 466 s 12; 2013 c 11 s 17; 2003 c 111 s 225; 2001 c 41 s 16; 1999 c 298 s 6; 1994 c 57 s 21; 1990 c 143 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.07.260.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1990 c 143 ss 1-8: "Sections 1 through 8 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1992." [ 1990 c 143 s 13.]

Civil rights

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3, RCW 29A.08.520.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.

Driver licensing agents duties regarding voter registration: RCW 46.20.155.